src/Korektor/sr-Latn.aff
FLAG num
SFX 862 Y 26
SFX 862 še šaninov
SFX 862 še šaninovog
SFX 862 še šaninovoga
SFX 862 še šaninovom
SFX 862 še šaninovome
SFX 862 še šaninovim
SFX 862 še šaninovi
SFX 862 še šaninovih
SFX 862 še šaninove
SFX 862 še šaninova
SFX 862 še šaninovoj
SFX 862 še šaninovu
SFX 862 še šaninovo
SFX 862 še šankin
SFX 862 še šankinog
SFX 862 še šankinoga
SFX 862 še šankinom
SFX 862 še šankinome
SFX 862 še šankinim
SFX 862 še šankini
SFX 862 še šankinih
SFX 862 še šankine
SFX 862 še šankina
SFX 862 še šankinoj
SFX 862 še šankinu
SFX 862 še šankino

SFX 863 Y 26
SFX 863 na ančev
SFX 863 na ančevog
SFX 863 na ančevoga
SFX 863 na ančevom
SFX 863 na ančevome
SFX 863 na ančevim
SFX 863 na ančevi
SFX 863 na ančevih
SFX 863 na ančeve
SFX 863 na ančeva
SFX 863 na ančevoj
SFX 863 na ančevu
SFX 863 na ančevo
SFX 863 na ankin
SFX 863 na ankinog
SFX 863 na ankinoga
SFX 863 na ankinom
SFX 863 na ankinome
SFX 863 na ankinim
SFX 863 na ankini
SFX 863 na ankinih
SFX 863 na ankine
SFX 863 na ankina
SFX 863 na ankinoj
SFX 863 na ankinu
SFX 863 na ankino

SFX 864 Y 26
SFX 864 p pčaninov
SFX 864 p pčaninovog
SFX 864 p pčaninovoga
SFX 864 p pčaninovom
SFX 864 p pčaninovome
SFX 864 p pčaninovim
SFX 864 p pčaninovi
SFX 864 p pčaninovih
SFX 864 p pčaninove
SFX 864 p pčaninova
SFX 864 p pčaninovoj
SFX 864 p pčaninovu
SFX 864 p pčaninovo
SFX 864 p pčankin
SFX 864 p pčankinog
SFX 864 p pčankinoga
SFX 864 p pčankinom
SFX 864 p pčankinome
SFX 864 p pčankinim
SFX 864 p pčankini
SFX 864 p pčankinih
SFX 864 p pčankine
SFX 864 p pčankina
SFX 864 p pčankinoj
SFX 864 p pčankinu
SFX 864 p pčankino

SFX 865 Y 26
SFX 865 čac čaninov
SFX 865 čac čaninovog
SFX 865 čac čaninovoga
SFX 865 čac čaninovom
SFX 865 čac čaninovome
SFX 865 čac čaninovim
SFX 865 čac čaninovi
SFX 865 čac čaninovih
SFX 865 čac čaninove
SFX 865 čac čaninova
SFX 865 čac čaninovoj
SFX 865 čac čaninovu
SFX 865 čac čaninovo
SFX 865 čac čankin
SFX 865 čac čankinog
SFX 865 čac čankinoga
SFX 865 čac čankinom
SFX 865 čac čankinome
SFX 865 čac čankinim
SFX 865 čac čankini
SFX 865 čac čankinih
SFX 865 čac čankine
SFX 865 čac čankina
SFX 865 čac čankinoj
SFX 865 čac čankinu
SFX 865 čac čankino

SFX 866 Y 26
SFX 866 le ljaninov
SFX 866 le ljaninovog
SFX 866 le ljaninovoga
SFX 866 le ljaninovom
SFX 866 le ljaninovome
SFX 866 le ljaninovim
SFX 866 le ljaninovi
SFX 866 le ljaninovih
SFX 866 le ljaninove
SFX 866 le ljaninova
SFX 866 le ljaninovoj
SFX 866 le ljaninovu
SFX 866 le ljaninovo
SFX 866 le ljankin
SFX 866 le ljankinog
SFX 866 le ljankinoga
SFX 866 le ljankinom
SFX 866 le ljankinome
SFX 866 le ljankinim
SFX 866 le ljankini
SFX 866 le ljankinih
SFX 866 le ljankine
SFX 866 le ljankina
SFX 866 le ljankinoj
SFX 866 le ljankinu
SFX 866 le ljankino

SFX 867 Y 26
SFX 867 do đaninov
SFX 867 do đaninovog
SFX 867 do đaninovoga
SFX 867 do đaninovom
SFX 867 do đaninovome
SFX 867 do đaninovim
SFX 867 do đaninovi
SFX 867 do đaninovih
SFX 867 do đaninove
SFX 867 do đaninova
SFX 867 do đaninovoj
SFX 867 do đaninovu
SFX 867 do đaninovo
SFX 867 do đankin
SFX 867 do đankinog
SFX 867 do đankinoga
SFX 867 do đankinom
SFX 867 do đankinome
SFX 867 do đankinim
SFX 867 do đankini
SFX 867 do đankinih
SFX 867 do đankine
SFX 867 do đankina
SFX 867 do đankinoj
SFX 867 do đankinu
SFX 867 do đankino

SFX 868 Y 26
SFX 868 i ljaninov
SFX 868 i ljaninovog
SFX 868 i ljaninovoga
SFX 868 i ljaninovom
SFX 868 i ljaninovome
SFX 868 i ljaninovim
SFX 868 i ljaninovi
SFX 868 i ljaninovih
SFX 868 i ljaninove
SFX 868 i ljaninova
SFX 868 i ljaninovoj
SFX 868 i ljaninovu
SFX 868 i ljaninovo
SFX 868 i ljankin
SFX 868 i ljankinog
SFX 868 i ljankinoga
SFX 868 i ljankinom
SFX 868 i ljankinome
SFX 868 i ljankinim
SFX 868 i ljankini
SFX 868 i ljankinih
SFX 868 i ljankine
SFX 868 i ljankina
SFX 868 i ljankinoj
SFX 868 i ljankinu
SFX 868 i ljankino

SFX 869 Y 26
SFX 869 đe đaninov
SFX 869 đe đaninovog
SFX 869 đe đaninovoga
SFX 869 đe đaninovom
SFX 869 đe đaninovome
SFX 869 đe đaninovim
SFX 869 đe đaninovi
SFX 869 đe đaninovih
SFX 869 đe đaninove
SFX 869 đe đaninova
SFX 869 đe đaninovoj
SFX 869 đe đaninovu
SFX 869 đe đaninovo
SFX 869 đe đankin
SFX 869 đe đankinog
SFX 869 đe đankinoga
SFX 869 đe đankinom
SFX 869 đe đankinome
SFX 869 đe đankinim
SFX 869 đe đankini
SFX 869 đe đankinih
SFX 869 đe đankine
SFX 869 đe đankina
SFX 869 đe đankinoj
SFX 869 đe đankinu
SFX 869 đe đankino

SFX 870 Y 26
SFX 870 za žaninov
SFX 870 za žaninovog
SFX 870 za žaninovoga
SFX 870 za žaninovom
SFX 870 za žaninovome
SFX 870 za žaninovim
SFX 870 za žaninovi
SFX 870 za žaninovih
SFX 870 za žaninove
SFX 870 za žaninova
SFX 870 za žaninovoj
SFX 870 za žaninovu
SFX 870 za žaninovo
SFX 870 za žankin
SFX 870 za žankinog
SFX 870 za žankinoga
SFX 870 za žankinom
SFX 870 za žankinome
SFX 870 za žankinim
SFX 870 za žankini
SFX 870 za žankinih
SFX 870 za žankine
SFX 870 za žankina
SFX 870 za žankinoj
SFX 870 za žankinu
SFX 870 za žankino

SFX 871 Y 26
SFX 871 zna žnjaninov
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovog
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovoga
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovom
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovome
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovim
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovi
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovih
SFX 871 zna žnjaninove
SFX 871 zna žnjaninova
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovoj
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovu
SFX 871 zna žnjaninovo
SFX 871 zna žnjankin
SFX 871 zna žnjankinog
SFX 871 zna žnjankinoga
SFX 871 zna žnjankinom
SFX 871 zna žnjankinome
SFX 871 zna žnjankinim
SFX 871 zna žnjankini
SFX 871 zna žnjankinih
SFX 871 zna žnjankine
SFX 871 zna žnjankina
SFX 871 zna žnjankinoj
SFX 871 zna žnjankinu
SFX 871 zna žnjankino

SFX 872 Y 26
SFX 872 ž žaninov
SFX 872 ž žaninovog
SFX 872 ž žaninovoga
SFX 872 ž žaninovom
SFX 872 ž žaninovome
SFX 872 ž žaninovim
SFX 872 ž žaninovi
SFX 872 ž žaninovih
SFX 872 ž žaninove
SFX 872 ž žaninova
SFX 872 ž žaninovoj
SFX 872 ž žaninovu
SFX 872 ž žaninovo
SFX 872 ž žankin
SFX 872 ž žankinog
SFX 872 ž žankinoga
SFX 872 ž žankinom
SFX 872 ž žankinome
SFX 872 ž žankinim
SFX 872 ž žankini
SFX 872 ž žankinih
SFX 872 ž žankine
SFX 872 ž žankina
SFX 872 ž žankinoj
SFX 872 ž žankinu
SFX 872 ž žankino

SFX 873 Y 26
SFX 873 o njaninov
SFX 873 o njaninovog
SFX 873 o njaninovoga
SFX 873 o njaninovom
SFX 873 o njaninovome
SFX 873 o njaninovim
SFX 873 o njaninovi
SFX 873 o njaninovih
SFX 873 o njaninove
SFX 873 o njaninova
SFX 873 o njaninovoj
SFX 873 o njaninovu
SFX 873 o njaninovo
SFX 873 o njankin
SFX 873 o njankinog
SFX 873 o njankinoga
SFX 873 o njankinom
SFX 873 o njankinome
SFX 873 o njankinim
SFX 873 o njankini
SFX 873 o njankinih
SFX 873 o njankine
SFX 873 o njankina
SFX 873 o njankinoj
SFX 873 o njankinu
SFX 873 o njankino

SFX 874 Y 26
SFX 874 čko čaninov
SFX 874 čko čaninovog
SFX 874 čko čaninovoga
SFX 874 čko čaninovom
SFX 874 čko čaninovome
SFX 874 čko čaninovim
SFX 874 čko čaninovi
SFX 874 čko čaninovih
SFX 874 čko čaninove
SFX 874 čko čaninova
SFX 874 čko čaninovoj
SFX 874 čko čaninovu
SFX 874 čko čaninovo
SFX 874 čko čankin
SFX 874 čko čankinog
SFX 874 čko čankinoga
SFX 874 čko čankinom
SFX 874 čko čankinome
SFX 874 čko čankinim
SFX 874 čko čankini
SFX 874 čko čankinih
SFX 874 čko čankine
SFX 874 čko čankina
SFX 874 čko čankinoj
SFX 874 čko čankinu
SFX 874 čko čankino

SFX 875 Y 26
SFX 875 ska inov
SFX 875 ska inovog
SFX 875 ska inovoga
SFX 875 ska inovom
SFX 875 ska inovome
SFX 875 ska inovim
SFX 875 ska inovi
SFX 875 ska inovih
SFX 875 ska inove
SFX 875 ska inova
SFX 875 ska inovoj
SFX 875 ska inovu
SFX 875 ska inovo
SFX 875 ska kin
SFX 875 ska kinog
SFX 875 ska kinoga
SFX 875 ska kinom
SFX 875 ska kinome
SFX 875 ska kinim
SFX 875 ska kini
SFX 875 ska kinih
SFX 875 ska kine
SFX 875 ska kina
SFX 875 ska kinoj
SFX 875 ska kinu
SFX 875 ska kino
