src/Korektor/sr-Latn.dic
Bogiše/862
Bosna/863
Botrop/864
Bočac/865
Brgule/866
Brdo/867
Bregovi/868
Brežđe/869
Breza/870
Brezna/871
Brza/870
Briž/872
Brno/873
Brčko/874
Bugarska/875
Busnovi/868
Venčac/865
Vilovi/868
Vitoše/862
Vlaole/866
Voronjež/872
Vrbovno/873
Vrtop/864
Gaza/870
Gazijantep/864
Gajevi/868
Gatino/873
Giza/870
Gramađe/869
Gračac/865
Grebno/873
Grezna/871
Grčac/865
Dvorovi/868
Delimeđe/869
Dijelovi/868
Domžale/866
Drmno/873
Eskondido/867
Žerađe/869
Žitorađe/869
Zabrđe/869
Zavinograđe/869
Zagrađe/869
Zecovi/868
Zlatokop/864
Izumno/873
Kakmuž/872
Kevi/868
Kladno/873
Kluž/872
Kovizle/866
Kolorado/867
Korovi/868
Košarno/873
Koševi/868
Krekovi/868
Krnule/866
Kumodraž/872
Laole/866
Laredo/867
Livađe/869
Lijež/872
Lozna/871
Lugovi/868
Ljutež/872
Malavi/868
Maldivi/868
Male/866
Manajle/866
Maovi/868
Međuvođe/869
Mendoza/870
Misisipi/868
Nabrđe/869
Nejpjido/867
Njiređhaza/870
Obrež/872
Obrijež/872
Oraše/862
Orlando/867
Otočac/865
Padež/872
Pajež/872
Pale/866
Paljuvi/868
Plejno/873
Pobrđe/869
Pobuđe/869
Podbrdo/867
Podgrađe/869
Pojezna/871
Popovi/868
Portorož/872
Potočac/865
Prebreza/870
Predole/866
Prilep/864
Probištip/864
Pustoše/862
Pučile/866
Rino/873
Rubribreza/870
Rudno/873
Rudo/867
Sakule/866
Svođe/869
Sevojno/873
Semedraž/872
Sikole/866
Sip/864
Sirogojno/873
Skrapež/872
Stanovi/868
Suharno/873
Suhotno/873
Tempi/868
Tolido/867
Trpeza/870
Trupale/866
Tulež/872
Tuluza/870
Tupale/866
Ursule/866
Fortaleza/870
Hokaido/867
Čikule/866
Čorle/866
Čučale/866
Džep/864
Šibovi/868
Štip/864
